Florida, session 2026, SB310.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 908.112, Florida Statutes, is created to 24 read: 25 908.112âU-visa certification policy.â 26 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 27 (a)ââCertification formâ means Form I-918, Supplement B, U 28 Nonimmigrant Status Certification as required by 8 U.S.C. s. 29 1184(p). 30 (b)ââCertifying agencyâ means a state or local law 31 enforcement agency, a prosecutor, a judge, or any other 32 governmental agency that has criminal, civil, administrative, 33 investigative, or prosecutorial authority. 34 (c)ââCertifying officialâ means any of the following: 35 1.âThe head of the certifying agency. 36 2.âA person in a supervisory role who has been specifically 37 designated by the head of the certifying agency to issue Form I 38 918 Supplement B certifications on behalf of the agency. 39 3.âA judge. 40 4.âAny other certifying official described in 8 C.F.R. s. 41 214.14(a)(3). 42 (d)ââPetitionerâ means a person who requests a 43 certification, including indirect and bystander victims. 44 (e)ââQualifying criminal activityâ means an offense for 45 which the elements are substantially similar to an offense 46 described in 8 U.S.C. s. 1101(a)(15)(U)(iii) of the Immigration 47 and Nationality Act or the attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy 48 to commit such an offense. Qualifying criminal activity pursuant 49 to 8 U.S.C. s. 1011(a)(15)(U)(iii) includes, but is not limited 50 to, the following crimes: 51 1.âRape. 52 2.âTorture. 53 3.âHuman trafficking. 54 4.âIncest. 55 5.âDomestic violence. 56 6.âSexual assault. 57 7.âAbusive sexual contact. 58 8.âProstitution. 59 9.âSexual Exploitation. 60 10.âFemale genital mutilation. 61 11.âBeing held hostage. 62 12.âPeonage. 63 13.âPerjury. 64 14.âInvoluntary servitude. 65 15.âSlavery. 66 16.âKidnapping. 67 17.âAbduction. 68 18.âUnlawful criminal restraint. 69 19.âFalse imprisonment. 70 20.âBlackmail. 71 21.âExtortion. 72 22.âManslaughter. 73 23.âMurder. 74 24.âFelonious assault. 75 25.âWitness tampering. 76 26.âObstruction of justice. 77 27.âFraud in foreign labor contracting. 78 28.âStalking. 79 (2)âUpon the request of a petitioner or a victimâs family 80 member, a certifying official from a certifying agency must 81 certify victim helpfulness on the Form I-918 Supplement B 82 certification if the victim was a victim of a qualifying 83 criminal activity and has been helpful, is being helpful, or is 84 likely to be helpful to the detection or investigation or 85 prosecution of such qualifying criminal activity. 86 (3)âFor purposes of determining helpfulness pursuant to 87 subsection (2), there is a rebuttable presumption that a victim 88 is helpful, has been helpful, or is likely to be helpful to the 89 detection or investigation or prosecution of that qualifying 90 criminal activity if the victim has not refused or failed to 91 provide information and assistance reasonably requested by law 92 enforcement. 93 (4)âThe certifying official shall fully complete and sign 94 the Form I-918 Supplement B certification and, regarding victim 95 helpfulness, include specific details about the nature of the 96 crime investigated or prosecuted and a detailed description of 97 the victimâs helpfulness or likely helpfulness to the detection, 98 investigation, or prosecution of the criminal activity. The 99 certifying agency may not consider any other factors in deciding 100 whether to sign the certification form, except whether the 101 victim was a victim of qualifying criminal activity and the 102 victimâs helpfulness. 103 (5)âA current investigation or an arrest, the filing of 104 charges, or a prosecution or conviction are not required for the 105 victim to request and obtain the Form I-918 Supplement B 106 certification from a certifying official. 107 (6)âA certifying official may withdraw the certification 108 only if the victim refuses to provide information and assistance 109 when reasonably requested. 110 (7)(a)âIf a certifying official or certifying agency denies 111 certification under this section, the official or agency must, 112 in writing, notify the petitioner of the reason for the denial. 113 The denial notification must contain all of the following 114 information: 115 1.âAn internal case number that allows the certifying 116 agency to identify each certification request individually. 117 2.âThe date of the denial. 118 3.âThe reason for the denial, which must be of one of the 119 following: 120 a.âLack of qualifying criminal activity; 121 b.âLack of helpfulness; 122 c.âLack of jurisdiction over the certification request; or 123 d.âOther circumstances for which a certifying official or 124 agency may lawfully deny a certification. 125 (b)âUpon receiving notice that a request for certification 126 under this section is denied, a petitioner may provide 127 supplemental information to the certifying official or 128 certifying agency and request that the certification denial be 129 reviewed. 130 (c)âAfter a request is denied, a petitioner may submit a 131 new request for certification to a different certifying official 132 or certifying agency for processing if the initial certifying 133 official or certifying agency was involved in investigating the 134 qualifying criminal activity. 135 (d)âA certification official or agency shall keep a copy of 136 a denial notification for at least 3 years after the date of the 137 notification. 138 (8)(a)âExcept under circumstances in which there is good 139 cause for delay, a certifying official or certifying agency 140 shall grant or deny a request for certification: 141 1.âWithin 90 days after the date of the certification 142 request; or 143 2.âWithin 14 days after the date of the certification 144 request if the victim is in removal proceedings. 145 (b)âIf a certifying agency fails to respond within the 146 statutory timeframe or refuses to certify that an applicant was 147 a victim of qualifying criminal activity, the applicant may 148 petition a circuit court to review the determination of the 149 certifying agency within 30 days after such determination or 150 within 30 days after the expiration of the statutory timeframe. 151 (c)âThe circuit court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing 152 on such petition within 30 days after the petition is filed. 153 After conducting a hearing, if the circuit court is satisfied 154 that the applicant has proven his or her eligibility for Form I 155 918 Supplement B certification by a preponderance of the 156 evidence and if the circuit court finds that the certifying 157 official or agencyâs refusal to sign was unreasonable, the 158 circuit court judge may execute the certification form. In 159 assessing the reasonableness of the certifying official or 160 agencyâs decision or failure to respond, the circuit court may 161 consider whether the applicant has complied with the terms of 162 this section and whether circumstances exist that would justify 163 the deferral of a decision, including whether a certification 164 would jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation or the 165 prosecution or the safety of an individual, cause a suspect to 166 flee or evade detection, or result in the destruction of 167 evidence, or whether the applicantâs cooperation is incomplete. 168 Upon finding that the certifying official or agency denied the 169 application without a factual or legal justification or failed 170 to respond to the applicant within the specified timeframes, the 171 circuit court shall make an award of reasonable costs and 172 attorney fees to a prevailing applicant. Such determination 173 shall be without prejudice to any future proceeding premised 174 upon a material change in circumstances. 175 (d)âAny petition filed under paragraph (b), along with the 176 record of all hearings and all other pleadings, papers filed, 177 and orders entered in connection with such petition, must be 178 kept under seal by the clerk unless otherwise ordered by the 179 court. 180 (9)âCertifying officials and agencies are prohibited from 181 disclosing the immigration status of a victim or person 182 requesting the Form I-918 Supplement B certification, except to 183 comply with federal law or legal process or if authorized by the 184 victim or person requesting the Form I-918 Supplement B 185 certification. 186 (10)âA certifying official or agency that receives a 187 request for a Form I-918 Supplement B certification shall report 188 to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of 189 the Senate, and the Governor on or before January 15, 2027, and 190 annually thereafter, the number of victims or persons who 191 requested such certifications from the official or agency, the 192 number of certification forms that were signed, the number of 193 certification forms that were denied, the reason for each 194 denial, and the number of pending certifications on the date of 195 the report. 196 (11)âA certifying official or agency is immune from civil 197 and criminal liability for, in good faith, certifying or denying 198 certification under this section. 199 (12)âA certifying agency shall: 200 (a)âDesignate a person or persons within the agency 201 responsible for processing requests for certification under this 202 section. 203 (b)âDevelop written procedures for processing requests for 204 certification under this section. 205 (c)âEstablish a process for each certifying agency to train 206 certifying officials and communicate with community-based 207 organizations and faith-based service providers about this 208 process. 209 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.